Utah statutes.
31A-23a-404.   Extension of credit on premiums.
The extension of credit upon a premium by a licensee under this chapter to the
insured, without interest for not exceeding 90 days from the effective date of
the policy, or after that time with interest on the unpaid balance at not less
than the legal rate under Section 15-1-1, is not a violation of Subsection
31A-23a-402(2).  The installment or payroll deduction payment of premiums on
policies issued under an insurer's mass marketing program is not an extension
of credit.
